en: Menstrual products
xx: Menstrual products
cs: Menstruační pomůcky
da: Menstruationsprodukter
de: Menstruationsprodukte
es: Productos menstruales
fr: Produits menstruels
it: Prodotti mestruali
ja: 生理用品
nl: Menstruatieproducten
no: Menstruasjonsprodukter
pl: Produkty menstruacyjne
pt: Produtos menstruais
ru: Менструальные средства
sv: Mensskydd
tr: Menstrüel ürünler

en: Reusable Menstrual Products
de: Wiederverwendbare Menstruationsprodukte
es: Productos menstruales reutilizables
fr: Produits menstruels réutilisables
it: Prodotti mestruali riutilizzabili

en: Menstrual Underwear
de: Menstruationsunterwäsche
es: Ropa interior menstrual
fr: Culottes de règles
it: Mutandine mestruali
ja: 生理用ショーツ
nl: Menstruatieondergoed
no: Menstruasjonsundertøy
pl: Majtki menstruacyjne
pt: Calcinhas menstruais
ru: Менструальное нижнее белье
sv: Mensunderkläder
tr: Regl Külotları

en: Sanitary napkins
de: Damenbinden
es: Compresas sanitarias
fr: Serviettes hygiéniques

en: Panty Liners
fr: Protège lingerie

en: Feminine Deodorant
xx: Feminine Deodorant
cs: Dámský deodorant
da: Deodorant til kvinder
de: Damen-Deodorant
es: Desodorante femenino
fr: Déodorants intimes
it: Deodoranti femminili
ja: 女性用デオドラント
nl: Deodorant voor vrouwen
no: Deodoranter for kvinner
pl: Dezodoranty do higieny intymnej
pt: Desodorantes femininos
ru: Женские дезодоранты
sv: Intimdeodorant
tr: Kadın Deodorantı

en: Feminine Douches & Creams
xx: Feminine Douches & Creams
cs: Dámská intimní hygiena
da: Douche og vask til kvinder
de: Intim-Waschlotionen für Frauen
es: Cremas y duchas vaginales
fr: Gels de toilette intime et poires vaginales
it: Creme e lavande vaginali
ja: ビデ・洗浄器
nl: Vrouwelijke douches en wasemulsies
no: Dusjsåper og kremer for kvinner
pl: Płyny do higieny intymnej
pt: Produtos para higiene íntima
ru: Спринцовки и гели для женской гигиены
sv: Produkter för intimrengöring
tr: Vajinal Duşlar ve Kremler

en: Feminine Pads & Protectors
xx: Feminine Pads & Protectors
cs: Dámské hygienické vložky
da: Hygiejnebind
de: Slipeinlagen & Binden
es: Compresas y protectores femeninos
fr: Serviettes hygiéniques et protège-slips
it: Assorbenti e proteggi slip
ja: 生理用ナプキン
nl: Maandverband
no: Puter og beskyttere for kvinner
pl: Podpaski i wkładki higieniczne
pt: Absorventes e protetores femininos
ru: Женские гигиенические прокладки
sv: Bindor och trosskydd
tr: Kadın Pedleri

en: Menstrual Cups
xx: Menstrual Cups
cs: Menstruační kalíšky
da: Menstruationskopper
de: Menstruationstassen
es: Copas menstruales
fr: Coupes menstruelles
it: Coppe mestruali
ja: 月経カップ
nl: Menstruatiecups
no: Menstruasjonskopper
pl: Kubeczki menstruacyjne
pt: Coletores menstruais
ru: Менструальные чашечки
sv: Menskoppar
tr: Menstrüasyon Kabı

en: Tampons
xx: Tampons
cs: Tampóny
da: Tamponer
de: Tampons
es: Tampones
fr: Tampons, Tampons hygiéniques
it: Tamponi
ja: タンポン
nl: Tampons
no: Tamponger
pl: Tampony
pt: Tampões
ru: Тампоны
sv: Tamponger
tr: Tamponlar

en: Foot Care
xx: Foot Care
cs: Péče o nohy
da: Fodpleje
de: Fußpflege
es: Cuidado de los pies
fr: Soin des pieds
it: Cura dei piedi
ja: フットケア
nl: Voetverzorging
no: Fotpleie
pl: Pielęgnacja stóp
pt: Cuidados com os pés
ru: Средства для ухода за ногами
sv: Fotvård
tr: Ayak Bakımı

en: Bunion Care Supplies
xx: Bunion Care Supplies
cs: Péče o puchýře
da: Pleje af knyster
de: Ballenpflege
es: Tratamiento de juanetes
fr: Accessoires pour soin des oignons
it: Trattamento borsite dell'alluce
ja: 外反母趾治療薬
nl: Behandeling van likdoorns
no: Utstyr til ilkebehandling
pl: Leczenie haluksów
pt: Cuidados com joanetes
ru: Средства для лечения мозолей
sv: Produkter för vård av förhårdnader
tr: Bunyon Bakımı Malzemeleri

en: Corn & Callus Care Supplies
xx: Corn & Callus Care Supplies
cs: Péče o kuří oka a ztvrdlou kůži
da: Pleje af ligtorne og hård hud
de: Hühneraugen- & Hornhautprodukte
es: Tratamiento de callos
fr: Accessoires pour soin de la corne et des callosités
it: Trattamento calli e duroni
ja: たこ・うおの目治療薬
nl: Behandeling van likdoorns en eeltplekken
no: Utstyr til behandling av liktorn og træler
pl: Usuwanie nagniotków i modzeli
pt: Cuidados com espigões e calos
ru: Средства для лечения мозолей и ороговелостей
sv: Produkter för vård av valkar och liktornar
tr: Nasır ve Kallus Bakımı

en: Foot Odor Removers
xx: Foot Odor Removers
cs: Odstraňovače zápachu nohou
da: Behandling af fodsved
de: Fußgeruchskiller
es: Desodorante para pies
fr: Déodorants pour les pieds
it: Deodoranti per piedi
ja: 足用デオドラント
nl: Voetdeodorants
no: Fotluktfjernere
pl: Odświeżacze do stóp
pt: Desodorantes para os pés
ru: Дезодоранты для ног
sv: Medel mot dålig fotlukt
tr: Ayak Koku Gidericiler

en: Insoles & Inserts
xx: Insoles & Inserts
cs: Stélky a vložky do bot
da: Indlægssål
de: Einlegesohlen & Einlagen
es: Plantillas
fr: Semelles intérieures et talonnettes
it: Solette e sottopiedi
ja: インソール・中敷
nl: Inlegzolen
no: Innleggsåler og innsatser
pl: Wkładki do butów
pt: Palmilhas e proteções para os pés
ru: Стельки и вкладыши
sv: Iläggssulor och fotinlägg
tr: Ayakkabı Astar ve Keçeleri

en: Toe Spacers
xx: Toe Spacers
cs: Oddělovače prstů na nohou
da: Tådelere
de: Zehenspreizer
es: Separadores de dedos
fr: Séparateurs d'orteils
it: Distanziatori di alluci
ja: 足指パッド
nl: Teenspreiders
no: Tåskillere
pl: Rozdzielacze do palców
pt: Separador de dedos
ru: Разделители пальцев ног
sv: Tåseparatorer
tr: Ayak Parmağı Araları

en: Hair Care
xx: Hair Care
cs: Péče o vlasy
da: Hårpleje
de: Haarkosmetik
es: Cuidado capilar
fr: Soin des cheveux
it: Cura dei capelli
ja: ヘアケア用品
nl: Haarverzorging
no: Hårpleie
pl: Pielęgnacja włosów
pt: Cuidados com os cabelos
ru: Средства для ухода за волосами
sv: Hårvård
tr: Saç Bakımı

en: Hair Care Kits
xx: Hair Care Kits
cs: Sady péče o vlasy
da: Hårplejesæt
de: Haarpflege-Sets
es: Kits de cuidado capilar
fr: Kits de soin des cheveux
it: Kit per la cura dei capelli
ja: ヘアケア用品セット
nl: Haarverzorgingssets
no: Hårpleiesett
pl: Zestawy do pielęgnacji włosów
pt: Kits de cuidados com os cabelos
ru: Наборы средств для ухода за волосами
sv: Hårvårdskit
tr: Saç Bakım Setleri

en: Hair Color
xx: Hair Color
cs: Barvení vlasů
da: Hårfarve
de: Haarfärbemittel
es: Coloración
fr: Coloration des cheveux
it: Tintura per capelli
ja: ヘアカラー
nl: Haarkleurmiddelen
no: Hårfarge
pl: Produkty do koloryzacji włosów
pt: Tintura para cabelo
ru: Средства для окраски волос
sv: Hårfärg
tr: Saç Boyaları

en: Hair Color Removers
xx: Hair Color Removers
cs: Odstraňovače barvy na vlasy
da: Fjernelse af hårfarve
de: Haar-Decoloration
es: Decolorantes para pelo teñido
fr: Décolorants pour cheveux
it: Solventi per tinte per capelli
ja: ヘアカラーリムーバー
nl: Haarverfverwijderaar
no: Hårfargefjernere
pl: Ściągacze koloru
pt: Removedores de tinta de cabelo
ru: Средства для обесцвечивания волос
sv: Hårfärgsborttagning
tr: Saç Boyası Çıkarıcılar